Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.571

Department authorized to assess inspection fee on certain manufacturing facilities.

The department may, upon inspection, assess an inspection fee on any manufacturing facility that is required to be inspected under the PMO and does not satisfy the definition of "milk processing plant" as defined in this chapter, "food processing plant" as defined in RCW 69.07.010, or "food storage warehouse" as defined in RCW 69.10.005.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 27 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 27: See note following RCW 15.36.051.